Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1404.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1201 and 1204.1(a) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended to read:Section 1201. Certificates Qualifying Persons to Teach.--Only those persons holding one of the following certificates shall be qualified to teach in the public schools of this Commonwealth--(1) Permanent college certificate, (2) provisional college certificate, (3) normal school diploma, (4) normal school certificate, (5) special permanent certificate, (6) 1234567891011121314151617181920 special temporary certificate, (7) permanent State certificate, (8) residency certificate, (9) [intern] second career certificate, (10) certificates which are permanent licenses to teach by virtue of the provisions of section one thousand three hundred eight of the act, approved the eighteenth day of May, one thousand nine hundred eleven (Pamphlet Laws 309), as amended, which is repealed hereby, or (11) such other kinds of certificates as are issued under the standards prescribed by the State Board of Education. The State Board of Education shall also provide for issuance of certificates by district superintendents to meet such emergencies or shortage of teachers as may occur.Section 1204.1. Standard Employment Application.--(a) The Secretary of Education, in consultation with organizations representing school administrators, including personnel administrators, teachers and school boards, shall develop a standard employment application form for use by individuals eligible for or in possession of instructional, career and technical instructional, [intern] second career or career and technical [intern] second career teaching certificates in making application for employment with school districts within this Commonwealth.* * *Section 2. Section 1204.2(b) introductory paragraph of the act, amended July 11, 2024 (P.L.618, No.55), is amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 1204.2. Career and Technical Instructional Certificate.--* * *(b) In addition to other requirements promulgated by the State Board of Education, the Department of Education shall 20250HB1404PN1603 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 issue a Career and Technical [Intern] Second Career Certificate under 22 Pa. Code § 49.151 (relating to eligibility and criteria) to an individual seeking a position with the primary responsibility of teaching occupational skills in State-approved career and technical education programs in the public schools of this Commonwealth if the individual presents any of the following:* * *(b.2) The Career and Technical Second Career Certificate shall be issued for the period of time needed by an individual to complete eighteen (18) semester hours within a career and technical educator preparation program approved by the Department of Education, but in no case may the period of time exceed five (5) years from the date of issuance.(b.3) In addition to any other requirement promulgated by the State Board of Education, the Department of Education shall issue a Career and Technical Intern Certificate under 22 Pa. Code § 49.151 to an individual securing recognition of occupational competency upon the basis of credential review and adequate work experience beyond the learning period as established by the department in a competency area whether or not an occupational competency examination exists.(b.4) In addition to any other requirement promulgated by the State Board of Education, the Department of Education shall issue a Career and Technical Instructional Certificate under 22 Pa. Code § 49.142 to an individual securing recognition of occupational competency upon the basis of credential review and adequate work experience beyond the learning period as established by the department in a competency area whether or not an occupational competency examination exists.20250HB1404PN1603 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 3. Section 1207.1(a)(1) and (c) of the act are amended to read:Section 1207.1. Postbaccalaureate Certification.--(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Secretary of Education shall have all of the following powers and duties with regard to postbaccalaureate certification programs:(1) Evaluate and approve, in accordance with this section, all postbaccalaureate certification programs, including accelerated programs, leading to the certification of professional personnel including [intern] second career certification programs, residency certification programs and administrative certification programs.* * *(c) (1) Postbaccalaureate instructional [intern] second career certification programs shall provide flexible and accelerated pedagogical training to teachers who have demonstrated subject matter competency in a subject area related to their certification.(2) The Secretary of Education may make a one-time issuance of a postbaccalaureate instructional [intern] second career certificate for service in a specific area of instruction to candidates who, in addition to meeting the requirements of section 1209, present evidence of satisfactory achievement on the department-prescribed subject matter assessments related to the area of certification and hold a bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university. This certificate shall require continuing enrollment in an approved postbaccalaureate instructional [intern] second career certification program.20250HB1404PN1603 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) A postbaccalaureate instructional [intern] second career certificate shall be valid for [three (3)] five (5) years of teaching in the public schools of this Commonwealth and may not be renewed.(4) A candidate shall be issued an Instructional I Certificate upon successful completion of the approved postbaccalaureate instructional [intern] second career program provided that the candidate has satisfied the requirements of section 1209.* * *Section 4. An individual to whom the Department of Education has issued an intern certificate or career and technical intern certificate prior to the effective date of this section and which certificate is valid on the effective of this section shall be deemed to hold a second career certificate or career and technical second career certificate, as applicable, under the act and the regulations promulgated under 22 Pa. Code Ch. 49.Section 5. The regulations at 22 Pa. Code Ch. 49 are abrogated to the extent of any inconsistency with this act.Section 6. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1404PN1603 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021